Nebraska, session 109, LB305.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(2) Licensed physician means a person who is licensed to practice
medicine under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;
(3) Preceptor means a licensed physician that meets the
qualifications of a preceptorship program and participates in such
preceptorship program;
(4) Preceptorship program means an organized system of clinical
experience that, for the purpose of attaining specified learning
objectives, pairs an enrolled student of an accredited medical school in
the state with a preceptor; and
(5) Rural location means a county with less than one hundred
thousand residents.
Sec. 3. (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, a licensed physician participating as a preceptor in a
preceptorship program shall be eligible for a credit against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(2) The credit shall be a nonrefundable credit in an amount equal to
one thousand dollars for each rotation completed by the licensed
physician without compensation as a preceptor in a preceptorship program,
provided that each rotation consists of at least eighty or more hours of
clinical training.
(3) The maximum allowable amount of the credit in any single taxable
year for any single licensed physician is five thousand dollars.
Sec. 4. (1) A licensed physician shall apply for the credit allowed
under the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act by submitting an application to
the department on a form prescribed by the department. The application
shall include the following information:
-2-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
(a) An affidavit verifying that the licensed physician served
without compensation as a preceptor in a preceptorship program and met
all other requirements set forth in the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act for
claiming the credit; and
(b) Any other documentation required by the department.
(2) If the department determines that an application is complete and
that the licensed physician qualifies for the credit, the department
shall approve the application within the limits and according to the
priorities set forth in this section and shall certify the amount of the
credit approved to the licensed physician.
(3) The department may approve up to one million dollars in credits
under the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act in any single fiscal year.
Priority for approval of credits under the act shall be given to licensed
physicians who participated as a preceptor in a preceptorship program in
a rural location. Once credits have reached the annual limit for any
fiscal year, no additional credits shall be allowed for such fiscal year.
Credits shall be prorated among the credit requests received on the day
the annual limit is exceeded.
Sec. 5. A credit allowed under the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act
shall not be transferred, sold, or assigned.
Sec. 6. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act.
Sec. 7. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident
individuals as a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of
the Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
-3-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of
greater than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal
to twenty-five percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015, such
nonrefundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the code after
adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted
pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of
twenty-nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a
percentage of the federal credit allowable under section 21 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, whether or not the federal
credit was limited by the federal tax liability. The percentage of the
federal credit shall be one hundred percent for incomes not greater than
twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage shall be reduced by ten
percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction thereof, by which the
reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two thousand
dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for
individuals who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning
farmer or livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act
for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
-4-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
2006, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Advantage Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research
and Development Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the
Volunteer Emergency Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit
allowed under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if
the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 32 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net
operating loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining
eligibility for the federal credit.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of
1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section
77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for contributions to programs or projects certified for
tax credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic
Futures Act. Each partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S
corporation, each beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a
limited liability company shall report his or her share of the credit in
the same manner and proportion as he or she reports the partnership,
subchapter S corporation, estate, trust, or limited liability company
income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in
section 77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment
Act;
-5-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and
77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and
agricultural producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit
Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail
Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act; and .
(m) A credit as provided in the Preceptorship Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to
another state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for contributions to programs
or projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating
High Impact Economic Futures Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income
tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or
after January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended. The credit allowed for each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust qualifying for an income tax credit as an owner of
agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act shall be
equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion
of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to subsection (6) of
-6-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007,
and before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended, there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or
beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the
partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to
77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be
allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a
partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or
estate or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal to the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to
the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report
his or her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or
she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability
company, or estate or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member,
or beneficiary cannot fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit
may not be carried forward or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue
-7-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
Code of 1986, as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax
imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five
thousand dollars shall be allowed to any individual who purchases a
residence during the taxable year if such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely
blighted area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a
family member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual
cannot fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried
forward to subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection
with respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to
recapture by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the
credit sells or otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the
residence as his or her primary residence within five years after the end
of the taxable year in which the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an
individual's spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or
grandparent, whether by blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in the Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax
Credit Act, the Nebraska Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Property Tax Incentive Act, the Relocation Incentive Act, and the
Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a
-8-

LB305 LB305
2025 2025
refundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 shall be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of
gestation; and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual
claiming the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section
77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as
provided in section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income
tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections
77-3156, 77-3158, and 77-3159.
Sec. 8. Original section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-9-